Utah statutes.
78B-5-814.   Release, settlement, or statement by injured person -- When
rescission or disavowal provisions inapplicable.
Sections 78B-5-812 through 78B-5-816 do not apply if at least five days prior
to signing the settlement agreement, liability release, or statement, the
injured person signed a statement in writing indicating willingness and
agreement to the settlement agreement, liability release, or statement.
